Florida, session 2026, HB1111.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (4) through (7) of section 117.021,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5) through (8),
respectively, and a new subsection (4) is added to that section,
to read:
117.021 Electronic notarization.—
(4) When performing an electronic notarial act under s.
695.03, in addition to all other requirements of this section, a
notary public shall use an electronic signature that is
accompanied by a date, time stamp, and the name of the grantor
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1111-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1111 2026
and grantee. The date, time stamp, and name of the executing
party shall appear as a watermark through the signature to
prevent copying the signature to another document.
Section 2. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 695.26,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4) and (5),
respectively, subsection (1) is amended, and a new subsection
(3) is added to that section, to read:
695.26 Requirements for recording instruments affecting
real property.—
(1) No instrument by which the title to real property or
any interest therein is conveyed, assigned, encumbered, or
otherwise disposed of shall be recorded by the clerk of the
circuit court unless:
(a) The name of each person who executed such instrument
is legibly printed, typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument
immediately beneath the signature of such person and the post-
office address of each such person is legibly printed,
typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument;
(b) A clear and legible copy of a valid and unredacted
identification in the name of each person who executed such
instrument is presented to the clerk;
(c)(b) The name and post-office address of the natural
person who prepared the instrument or under whose supervision it
was prepared are legibly printed, typewritten, or stamped upon
such instrument;
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1111-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1111 2026
(d)(c) The name of each witness to the instrument is
legibly printed, typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument
immediately beneath the signature of such witness and the post
office address of each such person is legibly printed,
typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument;
(e)(d) The name of any notary public or other officer
authorized to take acknowledgments or proofs whose signature
appears upon the instrument is legibly printed, typewritten, or
stamped upon such instrument immediately beneath the signature
of such notary public or other officer authorized to take
acknowledgment or proofs;
(f)(e) A 3-inch by 3-inch space at the top right-hand
corner on the first page and a 1-inch by 3-inch space at the top
right-hand corner on each subsequent page are reserved for use
by the clerk of the court; and
(g)(f) In any instrument other than a mortgage conveying
or purporting to convey any interest in real property, the name
and post-office address of each grantee in such instrument are
legibly printed, typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument.

As used in this subsection the term "valid identification
document" means a government-issued photographic identification
card that includes the individual's name, address, photograph,
and signature and includes, but is not limited to, a driver
license, a passport, an identification card issued by a state, a
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1111-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1111 2026
consular identification card, or a permanent resident card.
(3) The clerk of the circuit court may return an
instrument for correction if it does not comply with subsection
(1). Such instrument must be returned within 3 business days
after receipt.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1111-00